fst/morphology/stems/morph_derivation.lexc
LEXICON -i1
-i1/:i/ -cihc- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1124 [1/145429]
-i1/:i/ -h "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=2/1124 [3/145429]
-i1/:i/ -hkw- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ -kosis- "weight: 21.516720" ; ! n=2/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ -kosisân "weight: 21.516720" ; ! n=2/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ -mak- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ -makan "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ -min "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ -naw "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ -nâkosi "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ -o "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=2/1124 [3/145429]
-i1/:i/ -ohtâwiy- "weight: 19.561867" ; ! n=3/1124 [4/145429]
-i1/:i/ -paýi "weight: 20.600429" ; ! n=5/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ -paýih "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ -paýiho "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ -paýihtâ "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ -paýin "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ -piskwan- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/1124 [1/145429]
-i1/:i/ -sit- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ -sk3 "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/1124 [2/145429]
-i1/:i/ Ca- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ Câ(h)- "weight: 18.039441" ; ! n=11/1124 [5/145429]
-i1+Der/N:i NA "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 (IPN) [0/145429]
@R.noun.Indep@-i1+Der/N:@R.noun.Indep@i NA_SG/a_POSS/im "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=1/1124 (IPC) [4/145429]
@R.class.AI@-i1+Der/V:@R.class.AI@i VAI-io "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=2/1124 (IPC) [3/145429]
-i1/:i/ ahcahkw- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ ak- "weight: 21.516720" ; ! n=2/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ akohp- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ akot1- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ akw2- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ anikwacâs- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ as- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ as2- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ asam- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ askiy--1 "weight: 20.823572" ; ! n=4/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ ast- "weight: 20.823572" ; ! n=4/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ astâ- "weight: 21.111254" ; ! n=3/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ atis- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ atosk- "weight: 16.604356" ; ! n=11/1124 [21/145429]
-i1/:i/ atâw- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/1124 [1/145429]
-i1/:i/ awâsis- "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/1124 [2/145429]
-i1/:i/ ay- "weight: 15.344814" ; ! n=37/1124 [22/145429]
-i1/:i/ ay1- "weight: 12.346627" ; ! n=48/1124 [340/145429]
-i1/:i/ ayam- "weight: 14.234800" ; ! n=13/1124 [190/145429]
-i1/:i/ ayami- "weight: 14.234800" ; ! n=13/1124 [190/145429]
-i1/:i/ ayis2- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ ayâ- "weight: 12.444527" ; ! n=49/1124 [302/145429]
-i1/:i/ ayân- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ ayâw- "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/1124 [2/145429]
-i1/:i/ aýis1- "weight: 17.546964" ; ! n=6/1124 [15/145429]
-i1/:i/ aýwê- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ cistêmâw- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1124 [1/145429]
-i1/:i/ cîhk- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ iT- "weight: 12.163285" ; ! n=58/1124 [338/145429]
-i1/:i/ iskwêw- "weight: 20.418107" ; ! n=6/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ isp- "weight: 21.111254" ; ! n=3/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ itôt- "weight: 17.903639" ; ! n=1/1124 [63/145429]
-i1/:i/ kakêsk- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1124 [1/145429]
-i1/:i/ kanaw- "weight: 18.868720" ; ! n=6/1124 [4/145429]
-i1/:i/ kapê- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ kask5- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ kihiw- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ kik- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ kinosêw- "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=2/1124 [3/145429]
-i1/:i/ kinêpikw- "weight: 18.714569" ; ! n=1/1124 [28/145429]
-i1/:i/ kip- "weight: 19.849549" ; ! n=9/1124 [1/145429]
-i1/:i/ kisk- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1124 [1/145429]
-i1/:i/ kiskinw- "weight: 16.748457" ; ! n=4/1124 [50/145429]
-i1/:i/ kist2- "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/1124 [2/145429]
-i1/:i/ kistik- "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/1124 [2/145429]
-i1/:i/ kisê- "weight: 19.051042" ; ! n=4/1124 [5/145429]
-i1/:i/ kisîpêk- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/1124 [2/145429]
-i1/:i/ kit2- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ kito- "weight: 19.051042" ; ! n=5/1124 [4/145429]
-i1/:i/ kiy- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ kohkôs- "weight: 21.516720" ; ! n=2/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ kotawê- "weight: 21.516720" ; ! n=2/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ kwâhkw- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ kwâskw- "weight: 21.516720" ; ! n=2/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ kâT- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ kâhk- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1124 [1/145429]
-i1/:i/ kâhkâkiw- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ kâhkêwakw- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1124 [1/145429]
-i1/:i/ kâkîs- "weight: 21.516720" ; ! n=2/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ kêhtê- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ kîhk1- "weight: 20.437336" ; ! n=5/1124 [1/145429]
-i1/:i/ kîhkâ- "weight: 20.437336" ; ! n=5/1124 [1/145429]
-i1/:i/ kîhkâ2- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ kîkw- "weight: 17.652325" ; ! n=3/1124 [27/145429]
-i1/:i/ kîs1- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ kîsik- "weight: 13.795110" ; ! n=27/1124 [142/145429]
-i1/:i/ kîsikw- "weight: 18.003723" ; ! n=3/1124 [19/145429]
-i1/:i/ kîsk- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/1124 [1/145429]
-i1/:i/ kîsow- "weight: 21.516720" ; ! n=2/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ mahk- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ mahkahkw- "weight: 20.823572" ; ! n=4/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ man- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1124 [1/145429]
-i1/:i/ manicôs- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ manitow- "weight: 15.985317" ; ! n=11/1124 [39/145429]
-i1/:i/ masin- "weight: 15.285201" ; ! n=8/1124 [108/145429]
-i1/:i/ maskihkiy- "weight: 17.872387" ; ! n=5/1124 [13/145429]
-i1/:i/ maskimot- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ maskosiy- "weight: 21.516720" ; ! n=2/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ maskotêw- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ maskw- "weight: 20.437336" ; ! n=1/1124 [5/145429]
-i1/:i/ mat- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/1124 [2/145429]
-i1/:i/ matwê- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ maw- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ mi- "weight: 21.516720" ; ! n=2/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ mihkw- "weight: 21.111254" ; ! n=3/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ miht- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ mimikw- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1124 [1/145429]
-i1/:i/ min2- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ minahikw- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1124 [1/145429]
-i1/:i/ minihkw- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ mis- "weight: 21.516720" ; ! n=2/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ mistikw- "weight: 18.868720" ; ! n=4/1124 [6/145429]
-i1/:i/ mitim- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ miý--1 "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=1/1124 [4/145429]
-i1/:i/ miýw- "weight: 17.083929" ; ! n=11/1124 [13/145429]
-i1/:i/ miýâ- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ miýêsT- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ miýêst- "weight: 21.516720" ; ! n=2/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ mohtêw- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ mostosw- "weight: 19.561867" ; ! n=4/1124 [3/145429]
-i1/:i/ mow- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/1124 [2/145429]
-i1/:i/ mâcî- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ mâmaw- "weight: 19.967332" ; ! n=2/1124 [4/145429]
-i1/:i/ mâmisk- "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=3/1124 [1/145429]
-i1/:i/ mâmiton- "weight: 18.581038" ; ! n=8/1124 [4/145429]
-i1/:i/ mân- "weight: 20.437336" ; ! n=1/1124 [5/145429]
-i1/:i/ mât1- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]
-i1/:i/ mâto- "weight: 22.209867" ; ! n=1/1124 [0/145429]

LEXICON iT-
iT-/:iT/ -i1 "weight: 14.048775" ; ! n=25/762 [119/145429]
LEXICON kwêsk-
kwêsk-/:kwêsk/ -i1 "weight: 17.546964" ; ! n=6/104 [15/145429]
LEXICON kîs1-
kîs1-/:kîs/ -i1 "weight: 14.559040" ; ! n=19/141 [94/145429]
LEXICON kîsk-
kîsk-/:kîsk/ -i1 "weight: 25.465779" ; ! n=1/186 [0/145429]
LEXICON mahk-
mahk-/:mahk/ -i1 "weight: 27.013341" ; ! n=1/89 [0/145429]
LEXICON mihkw-
mihkw-/:mihkw/ -i1 "weight: 23.775971" ; ! n=4/127 [0/145429]
LEXICON miýw-
miýw-/:miýw/ -i1 "weight: 11.329959" ; ! n=84/374 [537/145429]
LEXICON mâý-
mâý-/:mâý/ -i1 "weight: 13.079780" ; ! n=32/198 [245/145429]
LEXICON mêst-
mêst-/:mêst/ -i1 "weight: 23.864888" ; ! n=3/142 [0/145429]
LEXICON pim-
pim-/:pim/ -i1 "weight: 22.033853" ; ! n=1/326 [0/145429]
LEXICON pêt-
pêt-/:pêt/ -i1 "weight: 24.720806" ; ! n=1/145 [0/145429]
LEXICON pêyakw-
pêyakw-/:pêyakw/ -i1 "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/129 [2/145429]
LEXICON takahk-
takahk-/:takahk/ -i1 "weight: 25.172792" ; ! n=1/112 [0/145429]
LEXICON w
w/:w/ -i1 "weight: 13.181180" ; ! n=44/598 [161/145429]
LEXICON wâp-
wâp-/:wâp/ -i1 "weight: 22.514643" ; ! n=1/161 [0/145429]
LEXICON wîn-
wîn-/:wîn/ -i1 "weight: 19.849549" ; ! n=1/83 [9/145429]
LEXICON âht-
âht-/:âht/ -i1 "weight: 23.592341" ; ! n=17/103 [0/145429]
